Utah statutes.
54-7-1.5.   Communications between commission personnel and parties restricted.

No member of the Public Service Commission, administrative law judge, or commission employee who is or may reasonably be expected to be involved in the decision making process, shall make or knowingly cause to be made to any party any communication relevant to the merits of any matter under adjudication unless notice and an opportunity to be heard are afforded to all parties. No party shall make or knowingly cause to be made to any member of the commission, administrative law judge, or commission employee who is or may reasonably be expected to be involved in the decision making process, an ex parte communication relevant to the merits of any matter under adjudication. Any member of the commission, administrative law judge or commission employee who receives an ex parte communication shall place the communication into the public record of the proceedings and afford all parties an opportunity to comment on the information.

